Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 70. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Secs. 11.70.010 — 11.70.030.
Intent to defraud; use of evidence by person on charge of perjury; intoxication as defense.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law, see AS 11.46.990(11), AS 11.81.630.]

Sec. 11.70.040.
Blind persons with guide dogs in public places.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 19 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 11.70.050.
[Renumbered as AS 05.12.010.]